src/fst/stems/pronouns.lexc
!! Pronouns
!  --------
!! Pronouns in the Sakirabiá language are references to things.

LEXICON Pronouns
õt+Pron+Prs+Sg1:õ%{tr%}  Cases "I/eu" ;
ẽt+Pron+Prs+Sg2:ẽ%{tr%}  Cases "you(sg)/" ;
te+Pron+Prs+Sg3:te    Cases   ;
sete+Pron+Prs+Sg3c:sete    Cases   ;
õt+Pron+Prs+Pl1Incl:kise    Cases   ;
õt+Pron+Prs+Pl13:ose    Cases   ;
ẽt+Pron+Prs+Pl2:eyat    Cases   ;
te+Pron+Prs+Pl3:teyat    Cases   ;
sete+Pron+Prs+Pl3c:seteyat    Cases   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
